Massachusetts, session 194th, H4203.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 195 of the Acts of 2022, an Act Providing for the Election of At-
large and District Councilors and School Committee Members in the City of Haverhill, is hereby
amended by inserting the following new paragraph at the end of section 2:- No person shall be a
candidate for nomination to more than one office at any preliminary election. Any person having
taken out and submitted nomination papers for more than one office appearing on the ballot for
any preliminary election shall withdraw from one such nomination no later than the last day and
hour for withdrawals as established by section 13 of chapter 53 of the General Laws. If a
candidate for nomination to more than one office shall neglect to so withdraw by the deadline,
they will appear on the official ballot as a candidate for the office for which they filed
nomination papers first in time, as shown by the city time stamp thereon.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage and be applicable to city
elections beginning with the 2025 biennial municipal election.
of 1